Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.052

Exemption from taxation and judicial process—Exceptions—Nonassignability—Deductions authorized.

(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or disability allowance, to the return of contributions, any optional benefit or death benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter and the moneys in the various funds created by this chapter shall be unassignable, and are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal or other local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance who is eligible:

(a) Under RCW 41.05.080 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions;

(b) Under a group health care benefit plan approved pursuant to RCW 28A.400.350 or 41.05.065 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom, of the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, or contributions to any person, firm, or corporation furnishing or providing medical, surgical, and hospital care or other health care insurance; or

(c) Under this system from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement association composed of retired teachers and/or public employees pursuant to a written agreement between the director and the retirement association.

Deductions under (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be made in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the director.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to *RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

[ 2012 c 159 s 20. Prior: 1991 c 365 s 21; 1991 c 35 s 63; 1989 c 360 s 25; 1987 c 326 s 23; 1982 c 135 s 1; 1981 c 294 s 13; 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 5; 1971 c 63 s 1; 1961 c 132 s 5; 1947 c 80 s 59; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-78; prior: 1937 c 22 s 9; 1917 c 163 s 19. Formerly RCW 41.32.590.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.23.060 was amended by 2021 c 35 s 15, changing "notice of payroll deduction" to "income withholding order."

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1987 c 326: See RCW 41.50.901.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.

Effective date—1961 c 132: See note following RCW 41.32.240.